Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 30 INCOME TAX
§ 63-3027. Computing Idaho taxable income of multistate or unitary corporations.

The Idaho taxable income of any multistate or unitary corporation transacting business both within and without this state shall be computed in accordance with the rules set forth in this section:

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Business income” means income arising from transactions and activity in the regular course of the taxpayer’s trade or business and includes income from the acquisition, management, or disposition of tangible and intangible property when such acquisition, management, or disposition constitutes integral or necessary parts of the taxpayer’s trade or business operations. Gains or losses and dividend and interest income from stock and securities of any foreign or domestic corporation shall be presumed to be income from intangible property, the acquisition, management, or disposition of which constitutes an integral part of the taxpayer’s trade or business; such presumption may only be overcome by clear and convincing evidence to the contrary.

“Commercial domicile” means the principal place from which the trade or business of the taxpayer is directed or managed.

“Compensation” means wages, salaries, commissions and any other form of remuneration paid to employees for personal services.

“Nonbusiness income” means all income other than business income.

“Sales” means all gross receipts of the taxpayer not allocated under subsections (d) through (h) of this section.

“State” means any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, any territory or possession of the United States, and any foreign country or political subdivision thereof.

Any taxpayer having income from business activity which is taxable both within and without this state shall allocate and apportion such net income as provided in this section.

For purposes of allocation and apportionment of income under this section, a taxpayer is taxable in another state if:

In that state he is subject to a net income tax, a franchise tax measured by net income, a franchise tax for the privilege of doing business, or a corporate stock tax; or

That state has jurisdiction to subject the taxpayer to a net income tax regardless of whether, in fact, the state does or does not.

Rents and royalties from real or tangible personal property, capital gains interest, dividends, or patent or copyright royalties, to the extent that they constitute nonbusiness income, shall be allocated as provided in subsections (e) through (h) of this section. Allocable nonbusiness income shall be limited to the total nonbusiness income received which is in excess of any related expenses which have been allowed as a deduction during the taxable year. In the case of allocable nonbusiness interest or dividends, related expenses include interest on indebtedness incurred or continued to purchase or carry assets on which the interest or dividends are nonbusiness income.

Net rents and royalties from real property located in this state are allocable to this state.
(e)(1) Net rents and royalties from real property located in this state are allocable to this state.

Net rents and royalties from tangible personal property are allocable to this state:
(i) If and to the extent that the property is utilized in this state, or

The extent of utilization of tangible personal property in a state is determined by multiplying the rents and royalties by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days of physical location of the property in the state during the rental or royalty period in the taxable year, and the denominator of which is the number of days of physical location of the property everywhere during all rental or royalty periods in the taxable year. If the physical location of the property during the rental or royalty period is unknown or unascertainable by the taxpayer, tangible personal property is utilized in the state in which the property was located at the time the rental or royalty payer obtained possession.

Capital gains and losses from sales of real property located in this state are allocable to this state.
(f)(1) Capital gains and losses from sales of real property located in this state are allocable to this state.

Capital gains and losses from sales of tangible personal property are allocable to this state if:

The property had a situs in this state at the time of the sale, or

The taxpayer’s commercial domicile is in this state and the taxpayer is not taxable in the state in which the property had a situs.

If and to the extent that the patent or copyright is utilized by the payer in a state in which the taxpayer is not taxable and the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is in this state.

Capital gains and losses from sales of intangible personal property are allocable to this state if the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is in this state, unless such gains and losses constitute business income as defined in this section.

Interest and dividends are allocable to this state if the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is in this state unless such interest or dividends constitute business income as defined in this section.

Patent and copyright royalties are allocable to this state:
(h)(1) Patent and copyright royalties are allocable to this state:

A patent is utilized in a state to the extent that it is employed in production, fabrication, manufacturing, or other processing in the state or to the extent that a patent product is produced in the state. If the basis of receipts from patent royalties does not permit allocation to states or if the accounting procedures do not reflect states of utilization, the patent is utilized in the state in which the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is located.

A copyright is utilized in a state to the extent that printing or other publication originates in the state. If the basis of receipts from copyright royalties does not permit allocation to states or if the accounting procedures do not reflect states of utilization, the copyright is utilized in the state in which the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is located.

In the case of a corporation not subject to subsection (t) of this section, the income or loss referred to in paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection shall be the taxable income of the corporation after making appropriate adjustments under the provisions of section 63-3022, Idaho Code.

The employment of any other method to effectuate an equitable allocation and apportionment of the taxpayer’s income.

If and to the extent that the patent or copyright is utilized by the payer in this state, or

(1) Notwithstanding the election allowed in article III.1 of the multistate tax compact enacted as section 63-3701, Idaho Code, all business income shall be apportioned to this state under subsection (j) of this section by multiplying the income by a fraction, the numerator of which is the property factor plus the payroll factor plus two (2) times the sales factor, and the denominator of which is four (4), except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection.

From the income or loss of the corporation or combined group of corporations, subtract any nonbusiness income, and add any nonbusiness loss, included in the total,

Multiply the amounts determined under paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection by the Idaho apportionment percentage defined in subsection (i) of this section, taking into account, where applicable, the property, payroll and sales of all corporations, wherever incorporated, which are included in the combined group. The resulting product shall be the amount of business income or loss apportioned to Idaho.

The base of operations or, if there is no base of operations, the place from which the service is directed or controlled is in the state, or

The base of operations or the place from which the service is directed or controlled is not in any state in which some part of the service is performed, but the individual’s residence is in this state.

The purchaser is the United States government, or

The taxpayer is not taxable in the state of the purchaser.

For a corporation incorporated in the United States or included in a consolidated federal corporation income tax return, the income to be included in the combined report shall be the taxable income for the corporation after making appropriate adjustments under the provisions of section 63-3022, Idaho Code;

For a corporation incorporated outside the United States, but not included in subsection (t)(2)(i) of this section, the income to be included in the combined report shall be the net income before income taxes of such corporation stated on the profit and loss statements of such corporation which are included within the consolidated profit and loss statement prepared for the group of related corporations of which the corporation is a member, which statement is prepared for filing with the United States securities and exchange commission. If the group of related companies is not required to file such profit and loss statement with the United States securities and exchange commission, the profit and loss statement prepared for reporting to shareholders and subject to review by an independent auditor may be used to obtain net income before income taxes. In the alternative, and subject to reasonable substantiation and consistent application by the group of related companies, adjustments may be made to the profit and loss statements of the corporation incorporated outside the United States, if necessary, to conform such statements to tax accounting standards as required by the Internal Revenue Code as if such corporation were incorporated in the United States and required to file a federal income tax return, subject to appropriate adjustments under the provisions of section 63-3022, Idaho Code;
(iii) If the income computation for a group under subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph results in a loss, such loss shall be taken into account in other years, subject to the provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of section 63-3022, Idaho Code; and

When one (1) or more corporations included in a combined report have excess inclusion income for a tax year that is taxable to those corporations pursuant to section 63-3011B, Idaho Code, the amount of such excess inclusion income shall be reported as the taxable income for those members of the combined group as provided by section 63-3011B, Idaho Code, and any net operating loss for that tax year or carried forward from an earlier tax year may be taken as deductions in other tax years, subject to the provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of section 63-3022, Idaho Code. In computing the net operating loss that may be used in another tax year for that corporation or other member of the combined return group, the excess inclusion income recognized as taxable income shall be deducted from gross income, as provided by treasury regulation 1.860E-1(a)(1).

(2) If a corporation, or a parent corporation of a combined group filing a combined report under sections 63-3027 and 63-3701, Idaho Code, is an electrical corporation as defined in section 61-119, Idaho Code, or is a telephone corporation as defined in section 62-603, Idaho Code, all business income of the corporation shall be apportioned to this state by multiplying the income by a fraction, the numerator of which is the property factor plus the payroll factor plus the sales factor, and the denominator of which is three (3).
(j)(1) In the case of a corporation or group of corporations combined under subsection (t) of this section, Idaho taxable income or loss of the corporation or combined group shall be determined as follows:

(2) To the amount determined as apportioned business income or loss under paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection, add nonbusiness income allocable entirely to Idaho under the provisions of this section or subtract nonbusiness loss allocable entirely to Idaho under this section. The resulting sum is the Idaho taxable income or loss of the corporation.

(k) The property factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the average value of the taxpayer’s real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used in this state during the tax period, and the denominator of which is the average value of all the taxpayer’s real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used during the tax period.

(
l
) Property owned by the taxpayer is valued at its original cost. Property rented by the taxpayer is valued at eight (8) times the net annual rental rate. Net annual rental rate is the annual rental rate paid by the taxpayer less any annual rental rate received by the taxpayer from subrentals.

(m) The average value of property shall be determined by averaging the values at the beginning and ending of the tax period, but the state tax commission may require the averaging of monthly values during the tax period if reasonably required to reflect properly the average value of the taxpayer’s property.

(n) The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the total amount paid in this state during the tax period by the taxpayer for compensation, and the denominator of which is the total compensation paid everywhere during the tax period.

(o) Compensation is paid in this state if:

(1) The individual’s service is performed entirely within the state; or

(2) The individual’s service is performed both within and without the state, but the service performed without the state is incidental to the individual’s service within the state; or

(3) Some of the service is performed in the state and:

(p) The sales factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the total sales of the taxpayer in this state during the tax period, and the denominator of which is the total sales of the taxpayer everywhere during the tax period.
(q) Sales of tangible personal property are in this state if:

(1) The property is delivered or shipped to a purchaser, other than the United States government, within this state regardless of the f.o.b. point or other conditions of the sale; or

(2) The property is shipped from an office, store, warehouse, factory, or other place of storage in this state and:

(r) Sales, other than sales of tangible property, are in this state, if:

(1) The income-producing activity is performed in this state; or

(2) The income-producing activity is performed both in and outside this state and a greater proportion of the income-producing activity is performed in this state than in any other state, based on costs of performance.

(s) If the allocation and apportionment provisions of this section do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer’s business activity in this state, the taxpayer may petition for or the state tax commission may require, in respect to all or any part of the taxpayer’s business activity, if reasonable:

(1) Separate accounting, provided that only that portion of general expenses clearly identifiable with Idaho business operations shall be allowed as a deduction;

(2) The exclusion of any one (1) or more of the factors;

(3) The inclusion of one (1) or more additional factors which will fairly represent the taxpayer’s business activity in this state; or

(t) For purposes of this section and sections 63-3027B through 63-3027E, Idaho Code, the income of two (2) or more corporations, wherever incorporated, the voting stock of which is more than fifty percent (50%) owned directly or indirectly by a common owner or owners, when necessary to accurately reflect income, shall be allocated or apportioned as if the group of corporations were a single corporation, in which event:

(1) The Idaho taxable income of any corporation subject to taxation in this state shall be determined by use of a combined report which includes the income, determined under paragraph (2) of this subsection, of all corporations which are members of a unitary business, allocated and apportioned using apportionment factors for all corporations included in the combined report and methods set out in this section. The use of a combined report does not disregard the separate corporate identities of the members of the unitary group. Each corporation which is transacting business in this state is responsible for its apportioned share of the combined business income plus its nonbusiness income or loss allocated to Idaho, minus its net operating loss carryover or carryback.

(2) The income of a corporation to be included in a combined report shall be determined as follows:

(u) If compensation is paid in the form of a reasonable cash fee for the performance of management services directly for the United States government at the Idaho national laboratory or any successor organization, separate accounting for that part of the business activity without regard to other activity of the taxpayer in the state of Idaho or elsewhere shall be required; provided that only that portion of general expenses clearly identifiable with Idaho business operations of that activity shall be allowed as a deduction.

§ 63-3027A. Computing Idaho taxable income of corporations not subject to section 63-3027, Idaho Code.

The Idaho taxable income of any corporation transacting business in this state which is not subject to the provisions of section 63-3027, Idaho Code, shall be computed by making appropriate adjustments under the provisions of section 63-3022, Idaho Code, to the taxable income of the taxpayer.

§ 63-3027B. Water’s-edge election.

A qualified taxpayer, as defined in paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of this section whose income is subject to the tax imposed under this chapter, may elect to determine its income derived from or attributable to sources within this state pursuant to a water’s-edge election in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, as modified by sections 63-3027B through 63-3027E, Idaho Code. A taxpayer who makes a water’s-edge election shall take into account the income and apportionment factors of all affiliated corporations in a unitary relationship with the taxpayer, other than corporations filing elections under section 936 of the Internal Revenue Code, and which either file a federal income tax return under the Internal Revenue Code or are included in a federal consolidated return.

For purposes of this section:

The phrase “over fifty percent (50%) of the voting stock directly or indirectly owned or controlled” shall be substituted for the phrase “at least eighty percent (80%)” each place it appears in section 1504 of the Internal Revenue Code.

Any combined return shall include only corporations the voting stock of which is more than fifty percent (50%) owned directly or indirectly by a common owner or owners.

A “qualified taxpayer” is a corporation which files, with the state income tax return on which the water’s-edge election is made, a consent to the reasonable production of documents within the taxing jurisdiction. The consent shall remain in effect so long as the water’s-edge election is in effect.

“Water’s-edge combined group” shall mean all corporations or entities properly includable in the election of a taxpayer in subsection (a) of this section.

The only income of a foreign sales corporation to be taken into account shall be the income subject to federal taxation, taking into account the provisions of section 921 of the Internal Revenue Code.

For each corporation within the combined group subject to tax by this chapter, a water’s-edge election will be deemed to have been filed and consent given under paragraph (3) of this subsection upon the filing of a valid water’s-edge election by any qualified taxpayer of the combined group. If during the period a water’s-edge election is in effect, another corporation subject to tax by this state becomes a part of the combined group, the corporation is deemed to have made a water’s-edge election and given consent under paragraph (3) of this subsection.

A water’s-edge election may be disregarded, and the income of the taxpayer determined without regard to the provisions of this section pursuant to those conditions which may be required by the state tax commission under subsection (b) of section 63-3027C, Idaho Code, if any corporation fails to comply with:

The domestic disclosure spreadsheet filing requirements defined in section 63-3027E, Idaho Code; or

This state’s legal and procedural requirements.

§ 63-3027C. Election is binding — Treatment of dividends.

A water’s-edge election shall be made in the original return for a year and shall be binding for all years thereafter, except as follows:

If, in the future, the United States supreme court or the supreme court of the state of Idaho rules that there is a state or federal constitutional right for a group of corporations to use the worldwide unitary method, a water’s-edge combined group of corporations may, without permission of the tax commission, change its future filing to the worldwide unitary method.

Any changes to use of the water’s-edge method or any other changes beyond those described in paragraph (1) of this subsection may only occur with the written permission of the tax commission.

No water’s-edge election shall be made for an income year beginning prior to the operative date of sections 63-3027B through 63-3027E, Idaho Code.

When disregarding an election or granting a change of election, the tax commission shall impose conditions which are necessary to prevent the avoidance of tax or to clearly reflect income for the period the election was made.

For purposes of this section:

Dividends received from payors incorporated outside the fifty (50) states and District of Columbia, to the extent taxable, shall be treated as income subject to apportionment.

The income of corporations filing elections under section 936 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be deemed dividends received from payors incorporated outside the fifty (50) states and District of Columbia.

Eighty-five per cent (85%) of all dividends described in subsection (c)(1) or (c)(2) of this section shall be excluded from income subject to apportionment.

The dividends subject to apportionment shall be in lieu of any expenses attributable to such dividend income.

Any actual dividend received from a corporation filing an election under section 936 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be eliminated from income.

Any dividend from any payor required to be combined under the water’s-edge election shall be eliminated from the calculation of apportionable income. Dividends received from a corporation described in section 922 of the Internal Revenue Code (defining “FSC”) will be treated as follows:

Dividends received from an FSC will be eliminated in the proportion that FSC federal taxable income for the year, out of which the dividend was paid, bears to the total FSC income before taxes for such year.

The portion of FSC dividend not eliminated under paragraph (1) of this subsection will be subject to the eighty-five per cent (85%) exclusion provided for in subsection (c)(3) of this section.

For purposes of this section:

Amounts included in income by reference to subpart F of part III of subchapter N of chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code shall constitute dividends from payors outside the fifty (50) states and District of Columbia;

Amounts included in income under part VI of subchapter P of chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code shall constitute dividends from payors outside the fifty (50) states and the District of Columbia; and
(3) Deemed distributions defined by Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be excluded from the income of the water’s-edge combined group.

§ 63-3027D. Presumptions and burdens of proof.

A qualified taxpayer and its affiliates shall be presumed to be a part of a unitary business and all income of that business shall be presumed to be apportionable business income if a valid water’s-edge election has been made, except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of section 63-3027C, Idaho Code.

A taxpayer shall have the burden of proof regarding the issue of whether or not a corporation is a member of a water’s-edge combined group.

§ 63-3027E. Operative dates.

Sections 63-3027B through 63-3027E, Idaho Code, shall be operative for the computation of taxes for the earlier of either of the following:

Taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1988.

Taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of the year after the year in which the board of examiners, upon advice of the attorney general, certifies to the tax commission that action has been taken by the United States, whether by statute, regulation, executive order, or any other means as may be appropriate, to comply substantially with the following:

A requirement that any corporation required to file a United States tax return or which could be included in a consolidated federal tax return be required to file with the Internal Revenue Service a domestic disclosure spreadsheet if its payroll, property, or sales in a foreign country exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000). The spreadsheet shall provide for full disclosure as to the income reported to each state, the state tax liability, and the method used for apportioning or allocating income to the states, and any other information as provided for by regulations as may be necessary to determine properly the amount of taxes due to each state and to identify the water’s-edge corporate group and those of its affiliates of which more than twenty per cent (20%) of the voting stock is directly or indirectly owned or controlled by a common owner or owners.

That the information filed pursuant to paragraph (2)(A) of this subsection will be available to qualified states. A “qualified state” is any state that does not require the use of the worldwide unitary method of taxation except in circumstances substantially similar to those authorized in subsection (c) of section 63-3027B, Idaho Code.

That qualified states are authorized access to all material developed by the Internal Revenue Service in its examination of multinational operations.

If sections 63-3027B through 63-3027E, Idaho Code, become operative pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this section, the tax commission may require, and taxpayers described in this subsection must file, no later than six months after filing the Idaho income tax return, a spreadsheet to provide disclosure as to the income reported for the year to the other states that require unitary combined reporting, the tax liability for each such state, the method used for allocating or apportioning income to such states, the property, payroll, and destination sales of the water’s-edge corporate group in each state, and to identify the water’s-edge corporate group and those of its affiliates of which more than twenty per cent (20%) of the voting stock is directly or indirectly owned or controlled by a common owner or owners. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to corporations which both make a water’s-edge election and have during the taxable year, payroll, property or sales in a foreign country which exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000). Notwithstanding the requirement to file a spreadsheet in any tax year, a taxpayer may forego [forgo] filing such a spreadsheet by submitting to the state tax commission a written declaration of its intention to forego [forgo] filing such spreadsheet for such year. In the event such declaration is filed in any tax year, no spreadsheet shall be required of such taxpayer and the percentage to be applied under section 63-3027C(c)(3)[, Idaho Code,] for such year shall be eighty per cent (80%) rather than eighty-five per cent (85%).

§ 63-3028. Deduction of federal income taxes

Corporations. [Repealed.]

§ 63-3029. Credit for income taxes paid another state.

A resident individual shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for the amount of any income tax imposed on the individual, an S corporation, partnership, limited liability company, estate or trust of which the individual is a shareholder, partner, member, or beneficiary (to the extent attributable to the individual as a result of the individual’s share of the S corporation’s, partnership’s, limited liability company’s, estate’s or trust’s taxable income in another state), for the taxable year by another state on income derived from sources therein while domiciled in Idaho and that is also subject to tax under this chapter.

For purposes of this section:

“State” shall include any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, or any possession or territory of the United States.

Except as provided in subsection (3)(a)(i) of this section, “individual” shall include estates and trusts.

References to “domiciled in” shall mean “a resident of” for purposes of computing the credit for trusts and estates.

Except as provided in subsection (3)(b) of this section:
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (3)(b) of this section:

The credit provided under this section to an individual shall not exceed the proportion of the tax otherwise due under this chapter that the amount of the adjusted gross income of the taxpayer derived from sources in the other state as modified by this chapter bears to the adjusted gross income of the taxpayer as modified by this chapter.

The credit provided under this section to an estate or trust shall not exceed the proportion of the tax otherwise due under this chapter that the amount of the federal total income of the estate or trust derived from sources in the other state and taxed by that state bears to the federal total income of the estate or trust. “Federal total income of the estate or trust derived from sources in the other state” shall be determined as provided under section 63-3026A, Idaho Code, as if the estate or trust was a nonresident.

Revenue from services rendered; and

Income from investments; and

When tax is paid to another state on income of an S corporation, partnership, limited liability company, estate or trust, the limitation calculated in subsection (3)(a) of this section with respect to that income shall be based on the proportion that the individual taxpayer’s share of the entity’s taxable income correctly reported to the other state under the laws of the other state bears to the individual’s adjusted gross income, as modified by this chapter. This limitation shall apply whether the tax is paid to the other state by the individual or by the S corporation, partnership, limited liability company, estate or trust.

The credit provided under this section shall further be limited to the tax paid to the other state.

To substantiate the credit allowed under this section, the state tax commission may require a copy of any receipt showing payment of income taxes to the other state or a copy of any return or returns filed with such other state, or both.

No credit allowed under this section shall be applied in calculating tax due under this chapter if the tax upon which the credit is based has been claimed as a deduction, unless the tax is restored to income on the Idaho return.

The credit shall not be allowed if such other state allows a credit against taxes imposed by such state for taxes paid or payable under this chapter.

For purposes of this section an income tax imposed on an S corporation, partnership, limited liability company, estate or trust includes:

A direct tax imposed upon the income for the taxable year of the S corporation, partnership, limited liability company, estate or trust; and

An excise or franchise tax that is measured by the income for the taxable year of the S corporation, partnership, limited liability company, estate or trust.

For purposes of subsection (7) of this section, an excise or franchise tax is “measured by income” only if the statute imposing the excise or franchise tax provides that the base for the tax:

Includes:

Revenue from sales;

The cost of goods, inventory or products with respect to revenue from sales; and

The cost of services rendered with respect to revenue from services rendered.

A part-year resident is entitled to a credit, determined in the manner prescribed by the state tax commission, for income taxes paid to another state in regard to income which is:

Earned while the taxpayer is domiciled or residing in this state; and

Subject to tax in such other state.

If the interest in an S corporation, partnership, limited liability company, estate or trust was held for less than the entire taxable year, the share attributable to the individual shall be allocated in the same manner as for federal purposes.

(b) Permits a deduction for one (1) or both of the following:

§ 63-3029A. Income tax credit for charitable contributions — Limitation.

At the election of the taxpayer, there shall be allowed, subject to the applicable limitations provided herein, as a credit against the income tax imposed by chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code, an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the aggregate amount of charitable contributions made by such taxpayer during the year to a nonprofit corporation, fund, foundation, trust, or association organized and operated exclusively for the benefit of institutions of higher learning located within the state of Idaho, including a university related research park, to nonprofit private or public institutions of elementary, secondary, or higher education or their foundations located within the state of Idaho, to Idaho education public broadcast system foundations within the state of Idaho, to the Idaho state historical society or its foundation, to the council for the deaf and hard of hearing, to the developmental disabilities council, to the commission for the blind and visually impaired, to the commission on Hispanic affairs, to the state independent living council, to the Idaho commission for libraries and to public libraries or their foundations and library districts or their foundations located within the state of Idaho, to the Idaho STEM action center, to nonprofit public or private museums or their foundations located within the state of Idaho, to residency programs accredited by the accreditation council for graduate medical education or the American osteopathic association or their designated nonprofit support organizations based in Idaho and devoted to training residents in Idaho and to dedicated accounts within the Idaho community foundation inc. that exclusively support the charitable purposes otherwise qualifying for the tax credit authorized under the provisions of this section.

In the case of a taxpayer other than a corporation, the amount allowable as a credit under this section for any taxable year shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of such taxpayer’s total income tax liability imposed by section 63-3024, Idaho Code, for the year, or five hundred dollars ($500), whichever is less.

In the case of a corporation, the amount allowable as a credit under this section for any taxable year shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of such corporation’s total income or franchise tax liability imposed by sections 63-3025 and 63-3025A, Idaho Code, for the year, or five thousand dollars ($5,000), whichever is less.

It maintains a regular faculty and curriculum and has a regularly enrolled body of students in attendance at the place where its educational activities are carried on.

It regularly offers education above the twelfth grade.

It is accredited by the northwest commission on colleges and universities.

For the purposes of this section, “contribution” means monetary donations reduced by the value of any benefit received in return such as food, entertainment or merchandise.

For the purposes of this section, “institution of higher learning” means only an educational institution located within this state meeting all of the following requirements:

For the purposes of this section, a nonprofit institution of secondary or higher education means a private nonprofit secondary or higher educational institution located within the state of Idaho, which is accredited by the northwest commission on colleges and universities, or accredited by a body approved by the state board of education. A nonprofit private institution of elementary education means a private nonprofit elementary educational institution located within the state of Idaho and accredited by the state board of education pursuant to section 33-119, Idaho Code.

For the purposes of this section, a nonprofit corporation, fund, foundation, trust or association that invests contributions in an endowment or otherwise shall be subject to the standards of care imposed under section 33-5003, Idaho Code.